Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.152

Fees—Service and product delivery areas.

In order to extend its services and programs, the department may charge reasonable fees for services and products provided in the areas of financial assistance, housing, international trade, community assistance, economic development, and other service delivery areas, except as otherwise provided. These fees are not intended to exceed the costs of providing the service or preparing and distributing the product.

[ 1994 c 284 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 284: See RCW 43.22A.901.